lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Paspirtukai > Elektrinių paspirtukų dalys > Akumuliatoriai ir įkrovikliai: Elektrinių paspirtukų baterijos; Elektrinių paspirtukų akumuliatorių įkrovikliai
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キックスクーター > 電動スクーターパーツ > バッテリー・充電器: 電動スクーター用バッテリー; 電動スクーター用バッテリー充電器
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 씽씽이 > 전기 스쿠터 부품 > 배터리 및 충전기: 전동 스쿠터 배터리; 전동 스쿠터 배터리 충전기
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 滑板車 > 電動滑板車零件 > 電池與充電器: 電動滑板車電池; 電動滑板車電池充電器
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Motoros rollerek > Elektromosroller-alkatrészek > Akkumulátorok és töltők: Elektromos roller akkumulátorok; Elektromos roller akkumulátortöltők
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Løbehjul > Dele til elløbehjul > Batterier og opladere: Batterier til e-løbehjul; Batteriopladere til e-løbehjul
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Romobili za vožnju > Dijelovi za električne romobile > Baterije i punjači: Baterije za električni skuter; Punjači baterija za električni skuter
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Skotrar > E-skoterdelar > Batterier och laddare: Batterier till elscootrar; Batteriladdare till elscootrar
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Scooter > Parti di scooter elettrici > Batterie e caricabatterie: Batterie per monopattini elettrici; Caricabatterie per monopattini elettrici
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Scooterrijden > E-scooters onderdelen > Batterijen en opladers: Batterijen voor e-scooters; Batterij-opladers voor e-scooters
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Scutere pentru grădinărit > Piese pentru trotinete electrice > Baterii și încărcătoare: Baterii pentru trotinete electrice; Încărcătoare de baterii pentru trotinete electrice
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Xe trượt scooter đạp chân > Phụ tùng xe máy điện > Pin và bộ sạc: Pin xe điện scooter; Bộ sạc pin xe điện scooter
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Riding Scooters > E-Scooters Parts > Batteries & Chargers: E-Scooter Batteries; E-Scooter Battery Chargers
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на тротинетки > Части за електрически тротинетки > Батерии и зарядни устройства: Батерии за електрически скутери; Зарядни устройства за батерии за електрически скутери
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на самокатах > Детали для электросамокатов > Аккумуляторы и зарядные устройства: Аккумуляторы для электросамокатов; Зарядные устройства для аккумуляторов электросамокатов
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Μοτοποδήλατα (Riding Scooters) > Ανταλλακτικά για ηλεκτρικά πατίνια > Μπαταρίες & φορτιστές: Μπαταρίες ηλεκτρικών πατινιών; Φορτιστές μπαταρίας ηλεκτρικών πατινιών
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > สกูทเตอร์สำหรับขับขี่ > ชิ้นส่วนสกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า > แบตเตอรี่และเครื่องชาร์จ: แบตเตอรี่สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; เครื่องชาร์จแบตเตอรี่สกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Skiroji > Deli za e-skiroje > Baterije in polnilniki: Baterije za električne skiroje; Polnilniki baterij za električne skiroje
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinetes > Piezas para patinetes eléctricos > Baterías y cargadores: Baterías para scooters eléctricos; Cargadores de batería para scooters eléctricos
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 滑板车 > 电动滑板车部件 > 电池和充电器: 电动滑板车电池; 电动滑板车电池充电器
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Motonetas > Peças de patinetes elétricos > Baterias e carregadores: Baterias para patinetes elétricos; Carregadores de bateria para patinetes elétricos
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Roller > Ersatzteile für E-Scooters > Batterien und Ladegeräte: E-Scooter-Akkus; E-Scooter-Ladegeräte
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Potkulaudat > Sähköpotkulautojen osat > Akut ja laturit: Sähköpotkulautojen akut; Sähköpotkulautojen akkulaturit
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sparkesykler > Deler til el-scootere > Batterier og ladere: Batterier for elsparkesykler; Batteriladere for elsparkesykler
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Scooter Motorlar > E-Scooter Parçaları > Bataryalar ve Şarj Aletleri: E-scooter pilleri; E-scooter pil şarj cihazları
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Hulajnogi > Części do hulajnóg elektrycznych > Akumulatory i ładowarki: Akumulatory do hulajnóg elektrycznych; Ładowarki do hulajnóg elektrycznych
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Scooters > Peças de scooters elétricas > Baterias e carregadores: Baterias de trotineta elétrica; Carregadores de bateria de trotineta elétrica
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Trottinettes > Pièces de trottinettes électriques > Batteries et chargeurs: Batteries de trottinettes électriques; Chargeurs de batteries pour trottinettes électriques
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Koloběžky a skútry > Elektroskútry – náhradní díly > Baterie a nabíječky: Baterie do elektrokoloběžek; Nabíječky baterií elektrokoloběžek
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kolobežky > Diely E-kolobežiek > Batérie a nabíjačky: Batérie pre elektrické kolobežky; Nabíjačky batérií pre elektrické kolobežky